Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-318
Maps, plans, and profiles; requisites; report; filing.

The maps hereinbefore provided for shall be drawn upon a scale sufficiently large to represent all the meanderings of the proposed improvements, and shall show the boundary lines of each lot, or tract of land, and of each street, road or railroad to be benefited thereby, the name of the owner of each lot or tract of land, as it then appeared on the deed records, the authority or company having in charge or controlling each public or corporate street, road or railroad, the distance in feet through each tract or parcel of land, the acreage thereof, and such other matters as the surveyor or engineer deems material. The profile shall show the surface, the grade lines, gradients, fixed and working sections. The report shall be filed with the board of supervisors of the district within sixty days after making such survey.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 9, p. 614;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 3, p. 511;

R.S.1913, § 1813;

C.S.1922, § 1760;

C.S.1929, § 31-417;

R.S.1943, § 31-318.

Maps and profiles are required to be made. Petersen v. Thurston, 161 Neb. 758, 74 N.W.2d 528 (1956).